District of Columbia statutes.
47-351.04

Eligibility requirements; bidding; awards process.

(a)

To become eligible to submit a bid under this subsection:

(1)

An insured institution shall provide the Mayor, or the CFO pursuant to § 47-351.02(c), with information from which the Mayor, or the CFO pursuant to § 47-351.02(c), can calculate a community development score under § 47-351.07. This information may include, but need not be limited to, current community development data, Community Reinvestment Act statement and evaluation with a minimum of “satisfactory” rating on its latest Community Reinvestment Act examination, and Home Mortgage Disclosure Act reports.

(2)

A noninsured institution shall submit to the Mayor, or the CFO pursuant to § 47-351.02(c), a statement of Equal Employment Opportunity or Affirmative Action.

(b)

Each year the Mayor, or the CFO pursuant to § 47-351.02(c), shall compile a list of eligible financial institutions that submit the information pursuant to the requirements of subsection (a) of this section.

(c)

The Mayor, or the CFO pursuant to § 47-351.02(c), shall send the solicitations for bids to all financial institutions that are eligible. The Mayor, or the CFO pursuant to § 47-351.02(c), shall remove from the eligible list those financial institutions that the Mayor, or the CFO pursuant to § 47-351.02(c), has deemed to be financially unsound and those bidders that have put District funds at risk pursuant to § 47-351.13(a).

(d)

In solicitations for bids, the Mayor, or the CFO pursuant to § 47-351.02(c), shall include the following information:

(1)

In the case of deposits or investments:

(A)

The term of the deposit or investments;

(B)

The approximate amount available for deposit or investment;

(C)

The evaluation criteria; and

(D)

All other information required by the Mayor, or the CFO pursuant to § 47-351.02(c), or that is necessary for compliance with this subchapter.

(2)

In the case of financial services:

(A)

A list of the financial services needed;

(B)

The evaluation criteria; and

(C)

All other information required by the Mayor, or the CFO pursuant to § 47-351.02(c), or that is necessary for compliance with this subchapter.

(e)

The Mayor, or the CFO pursuant to § 47-351.02(c), may solicit bids for either single financial services or groups of financial services.

(f)

If applicable, a bidder shall provide the following information in a bid:

(1)

The identity of the bidder;

(2)

The minimum and maximum amount of District funds the bidder will accept;

(3)

The rate of return;

(4)

The type of financial services to be provided and the cost to the District for the financial services;

(5)

The amount of the compensating balances, if any, and the rate of return on any deposit used for a compensating balance;

(6)

A description of the experience and capacity of the financial institution to perform the banking business for which the bid is submitted;

(7)

Information necessary to assess risk and liquidity; and

(8)

Any other information required by the Mayor, or the CFO pursuant to § 47-351.02(c).

(g)

The Mayor, or the CFO pursuant to § 47-351.02(c), shall make available to each bidder the notice of the bid award including the terms of the bid award.

(h)

Two or more eligible financial institutions may submit a joint bid.

(i)

The Mayor, or the CFO pursuant to § 47-351.02(c), may at any time prior to the notice of award withdraw a bid solicitation for good cause. The Mayor, or the CFO pursuant to § 47-351.02(c), shall notify any financial institution that has submitted a bid prior to the withdrawal of the bid solicitation.

(j)

The Mayor, or the CFO pursuant to § 47-351.02(c), may retain or maintain deposits, investments, or financial services agreements at a financial institution which is a successor to the contractual agreement.

History

Mar. 18, 1998, D.C. Law 12-56, § 2(c), 44 DCR 6933
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-264, § 52(b), 46 DCR 2118

Section References

This section is referenced in § 47-351.01, § 47-351.10, and § 47-351.11.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-351.4.

Emergency Legislation

See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 47-351.01.